Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1113
Officers; alternates; no compensation; acting officer; compensation.

No alternate officer, as such, shall receive any pay or compensation by virtue of his appointment or appointment and qualification, or shall enjoy any of the rights or privileges of the office to whose powers and duties he is designated to succeed. An acting officer, however, shall receive the same compensation and enjoy the same perquisites as would be received and enjoyed by the officer himself if present and available; Provided, that if, during the same period or any portion thereof, he is entitled to receive, and does receive, pay or compensation as deputy in the same office or as holder of another state or local office, the amount of the latter shall be deducted from the amount he otherwise would receive as acting officer; and provided further, that nothing herein shall be construed as affecting the compensation or perquisites of the officer concerned, if living.

Laws 1959, c. 457, § 13, p. 1521.